Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.030

Marketing of organic products—Standards—Restrictions—Evaluations to verify compliance.

(1) To be labeled, sold, or represented as an organic product, a product must be produced under standards established in this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. A producer, processor, or handler shall not represent, sell, or offer for sale any agricultural product with the representation that the product is organic if the producer, processor, or handler knows, or has reason to know, that the product has not been produced, processed, or handled in accordance with standards established in this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The department may conduct evaluations in retail establishments to verify compliance with organic labeling and advertising requirements of this chapter, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, and the national organic program.

[ 2010 c 109 s 3; 2002 c 220 s 3; 1992 c 71 s 3; 1989 c 354 s 30; 1985 c 247 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 s 30: "Section 30 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 1991." [ 1989 c 354 s 87.]

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Violation of RCW 15.86.030 constitutes violation of RCW 19.86.020: RCW 19.86.023.